Hawaii statutes.
§601-15 Style of process. The style of
process in the state courts shall run in the name of "The State of Hawaii",
and all prosecutions shall be carried on in the name and by the authority of
the State of Hawaii. [L Sp 1959 1st, c 5, §7; Supp, §213-12; HRS §601-15; am L
1972, c 88, §1(g)]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next